Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 19 Freedom of Information Act of 1967
The trial court's finding that a volunteer fire department had substantial justification for refusing disclosure of requested records was clearly erroneous and, therefore, the trial court abused its discretion in denying the appellant's petition for attorney's fees, notwithstanding the fire department's assertion that it was justified in believing that it was not subject to the FOIA because its only connection to public funding was indirect support via state and federal loans, where the fire department performed public safety and utility functions traditionally performed by governmental entities by providing fire protection and water service pursuant to its contractual arrangement with a fire protection district and received funding from a public source. Kristen Inc. Props., LLC v. Faulkner County Waterworks, 72 Ark. App. 37, 32 S.W.3d 60 (2000).

Arkansas Department of Human Services was a department of the State of Arkansas, and a suit against a state official in his official capacity was not a suit against that person but, rather, was a suit against that official's office, thus, even though the individual prevailed in obtaining certain public records under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, §25-19-101 et seq., under subsection (d) of this section, no award of attorney's fees could be assessed against either the Department or the director, who was acting as a state official in his official capacity; further, as an individual, the director had no administrative control of the public records as he would have had control of the public records only in his official capacity. George v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 88 Ark. App. 135, 195 S.W.3d 399 (2004).

Circuit court did not abuse its discretion in denying the citizen an award of attorneys' fees where there was substantial justification in appellees' position that their actions did not constitute a violation of the Freedom of Information Act and that their actions were not undertaken in bad faith. Harris v. City of Fort Smith, 366 Ark. 277, 234 S.W.3d 875 (2006).

Circuit court abused its discretion in awarding attorney fees under subsection (d) of this section because the mother of a decedent who died in police custody did not even partially prevail on her FOIA claim, let alone substantially prevail, where the circuit court's order specifically found that the city police department had responded promptly and provided public records as quickly as possible but that the records of its internal affairs department were not subject to disclosure.City of Little Rock v. Carpenter, 374 Ark. 511, 288 S.W.3d 647 (2008).

There was no abuse of discretion on the part of the circuit court in awarding an inmate's aunt attorney's fees under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967 because the aunt substantially prevailed, and the fact that the sergeant believed that the manifest was investigatory and, therefore, exempt did not mean that the sergeant was justified in so believing.Holladay v. Glass, 2017 Ark. App. 595, 534 S.W.3d 173 (2017).

Circuit court's denial of attorney's fees was proper because the current version of this section does not allow the court to assess fees or expenses against the State; instead, this section requires plaintiff to file a claim with the Arkansas State Claims Commission.Hyman v. Sadler, 2018 Ark. App. 82, 539 S.W.3d 642 (2018).

An inmate was entitled to a hearing on her request for documents from her prison file since the file was a public record and the Department of Correction was an agency of the state and denied her FOIA request for the documents. Orsini v. State, 340 Ark. 665, 13 S.W.3d 167 (2000).

Before invalidation of agency decision is sought on grounds of violation of this chapter, the board or agency must be given the opportunity to address the issue. Rehab Hospital Services Corp. v. Delta-Hills Health Systems Agency, Inc., 285 Ark. 397, 687 S.W.2d 840 (1985).

When a city or other local agency is involved in a suit under this chapter, the aggrieved person should bring suit in the local judicial district where the parties and witnesses are apt to reside and not, despite the wording of this section, in Pulaski County where most state agencies have their principal offices. Acorn v. Jackson, 263 Ark. 67, 562 S.W.2d 589 (1978).

When there is a complaint against a state agency under this chapter, the aggrieved person can appeal either to the Pulaski Circuit Court, where most state agencies have their principal office, or to the corresponding court in the county of his residence. Acorn v. Jackson, 263 Ark. 67, 562 S.W.2d 589 (1978).

When a teacher made a Freedom of Information Act (FOIA) request to a school district (district) after the teacher was terminated, and the denial of that request was reviewed in the same case in which the termination was contested, a trial court had no jurisdiction to grant the district's renewed motion for a protective order because (1) the order was sought under Ark. R. Civ. P. 26(c), which was independent of the FOIA, and (2) the renewed motion initiated no FOIA case, as the district was the records custodian and only a citizen could seek review of the denial of an FOIA request, and the motion was litigated while the termination case was on appeal.Hollis v. Fayetteville Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2016 Ark. App. 132, 485 S.W.3d 280 (2016).

Cited: Furman v. Holloway, 312 Ark. 378, 849 S.W.2d 520 (1993); Saline Mem. Hosp. v. Berry, 321 Ark. 588, 906 S.W.2d 297 (1995); National Park Medical Ctr. v. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs., 322 Ark. 595, 911 S.W.2d 250 (1995).

A description of its organization, including central and field offices, the general course and method of its operations, and the established locations, including, but not limited to, telephone numbers and street, mailing, electronic mail, and internet addresses and the methods by which the public may obtain access to public records;

A list and general description of its records, including computer databases;

Its regulations, rules of procedure, any formally proposed changes, and all other written statements of policy or interpretations formulated, adopted, or used by the agency, board, or commission in the discharge of its functions.

Rules, regulations, and opinions used in this section shall refer only to substantive and material items that directly affect procedure and decision-making.

Personnel policies, procedures, and internal policies shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Surveys, polls, and fact-gathering for decision-making shall not be subject to the provisions of this section.

Statistical data furnished to a state agency shall be posted only after the agency has concluded its final compilation and result;

All documents composing an administrative adjudication decision in a contested matter, except the parts of the decision that are expressly confidential under state or federal law; and

Copies of all records, regardless of medium or format, released under § 25-19-105 which, because of the nature of their subject matter, the agency, board, or commission determines have become or are likely to become the subject of frequent requests for substantially the same records.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 1107, § 3, provided: “Applicability. This act does not apply to a request for a public record that is received by the government entity before the effective date of this act [April 7, 2017].”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (c).

Trial court erred by finding that appellees'requirement that the driver pay a deposit of $2, 475 to obtain the requested records did not violate the Freedom of Information Act because this section did not apply, as the driver stated that she requested only copies of the recordings and did not ask for any type of special conversion or any type of compilation. The applicable provision to the driver's request was §25-19-105(d), as she simply requested a copy of the files, and therefore appellees could not charge fees that exceeded the cost of reproduction and could not include the hourly rate of a captain in assessing costs to the driver.Daugherty v. Jacksonville Police Dep't, 2012 Ark. 264, 411 S.W.3d 196 (2012).

ALR.

Construction and Application of Public Domain Doctrine Allowing Courts to Disregard FOIA Law Enforcement Exemption Based on Prior Public Release of Requested Records. 3 A.L.R. Fed. 3d Art. 5 (2016).

Construction and Application of Public Domain or Official Acknowledgment Doctrine Allowing Courts to Disregard FOIA Exemption, Other Than Law Enforcement Exemption, Based on Prior Public Release of Requested Records. 17 A.L.R. Fed. 3d Art. 1 (2016).

Complete a study of proposed exemptions from or additions to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.; and

Report to the General Assembly its recommendations concerning proposed exemptions from or additions to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

(1)The task force shall consist of nine (9) members as follows:

One (1) member appointed by the Governor;

One (1) member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

One (1) member appointed by the Arkansas Press Association, Inc.;

One (1) member appointed by the Arkansas Freedom of Information Coalition;

One (1) member appointed by the Arkansas Pro Chapter of the Society of Professional Journalists;

One (1) member appointed by the Arkansas Broadcasters Association;

One (1) member appointed by the Association of Arkansas Counties; and

One (1) member appointed by the Arkansas Municipal League.

(A)Each member of the task force shall serve a term of four (4) years.

A member of the task force shall not serve more than two (2) terms.

A vacancy on the task force shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment.

The task force shall elect from its membership:

A chair; and

Other officers deemed necessary by the task force.

(1)Five (5) members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting business.

The members of the task force shall meet at their own expense and shall not be entitled to reimbursement for mileage or per diem.

(1)The initial members of the task force shall be appointed within thirty (30) days of August 1, 2017.

The task force shall begin its review under subdivision (a)(2) of this section within thirty (30) days of the call of the first meeting.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Due to the addition of Subchapter 2 of this chapter by Acts 1995, No. 813, the preexisting provisions of this chapter have been designated as Subchapter 1.

Cross References. County interlocal agreements, §14-14-910.

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 430, § 10: Mar. 16, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is currently no general authority for interlocal cooperation among the various political subdivisions of this state and between political subdivisions of this state and other states, and that such authority will make it possible for such subdivision to perform local functions and provide local services much more efficiently. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 415, § 2: Mar. 21, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Interlocal Cooperation Act, Act 430 of 1967, was intended to permit local governmental units to make the most efficient uses of the powers and resources by enabling them to cooperate together with other local governmental units on a basis of mutual advantage, and that in many instances school districts of this state, and city and county governments, could provide and share facilities, employees, and services that would provide mutual benefits to their respective advantages and enable them thereby to perform their respective responsibilities with maximum efficiencies; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to enable school districts to participate in the Interlocal Cooperation Act. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 208, § 6: Feb. 18, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that water districts created under Act 114 of 1957 are authorized to individually undertake projects to utilize a water supply available as a result of multi-purpose reservoirs constructed by the United States Corps of Engineers; that it would be mutually beneficial to permit water districts created under Act 114 of 1957 to jointly and cooperatively undertake such projects and that this Act is immediately necessary to permit such cooperative or joint action by such water districts. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 3: June 30, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas laws for the operation and management of municipal waterworks are inadequate to accommodate the merger of two (2) or more large municipal waterworks; that a new law is needed to protect the financial and governmental interests of the various municipalities involved in consolidating the various municipal waterworks systems; that the financial savings and economies of scale which are anticipated from the merger will make the consolidation in the best interest of the citizens of the merging municipalities; that the consolidation agreement was achieved through persistent and complex negotiations balancing the various municipal interests involved and it is therefore necessary that the law take effect at a time prescribed by that agreement. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on June 30, 2001.”

Acts 2017, No. 711, § 14: Mar. 27, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., places undue restrictions on water systems; that, in order to satisfy such restrictions, a water system must forego certain undertakings to the detriment of the water system and its customers; and that this act is immediately necessary so that a water system may provide information to its utility partners, other government offices, and certain members of the public in order for the water system to serve its community as efficiently and effectively as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1967, No. 93, § 4; 1977, No. 652, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2804; Acts 1987, No. 49, § 1; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 1; 1993, No. 895, § 1; 1997, No. 540, § 52; 1997, No. 873, § 1; 1997, No. 1335, § 1; 1999, No. 1093, § 1; 2001, No. 1259, § 1; 2001, No. 1336, § 1; 2001, No. 1653, § 2; 2003, No. 213, § 1; 2003, No. 275, § 2; 2003, No. 763, § 2; 2003, No. 1214, § 1; 2005, No. 259, § 2; 2005, No. 2003, § 1; 2007, No. 268, § 2; 2007, No. 726, §§ 1, 2; 2007, No. 998, § 2; 2009, No. 631, § 2; 2009, No. 1291, § 1; 2011, No. 99, § 2; 2011, No. 168, § 1; 2013, No. 145, § 1; 2013, No. 235, § 2; 2013, No. 411, § 1; 2015, No. 186, § 3; 2015, No. 881, § 2; 2015, No. 1015, § 1; 2015, No. 1102, § 1; 2017, No. 711, § 1; 2019, No. 392, § 6; 2019, No. 568, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 3585; 2019, No. 1012, § 1; 2019, No. 1034, § 1.

Parties Entitled.